Maryland, session 2025, HB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1093*

HOUSE BILL 1093
Article – Real Property
8–401.
(a) Whenever the tenant or tenants fail to pay the rent when due and payable, it
shall be lawful for the landlord to have again and repossess the premises in accordance
with this section.
(f) (1) (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection AND
§ 8–407 OF THIS SUBTITLE, if judgment is given in favor of the landlord, and the tenant
fails to comply with the requirements of the order within 7 days, the court shall, at any
time after the expiration of the 7 days, issue its warrant OF RESTITUTION, directed to any
official of the county entitled to serve process, ordering the official to cause the landlord to
have again and repossess the property by putting the landlord, or the landlord’s duly
qualified agent or attorney, in possession of the property, and for that purpose to remove
from the property, by force if necessary, all the furniture, implements, tools, goods, effects
or other [chattels of every description whatsoever] PERSONAL PROPERTY belonging to the
tenant, or to any person claiming or holding by or under the tenant.
8–402.
(a) (1) A tenant under any periodic tenancy, or at the expiration of a lease, and
someone holding under the tenant, who shall unlawfully hold over beyond the expiration of
the lease or termination of the tenancy, shall be liable to the landlord for the actual
damages caused by the holding over.
(b) (2) (i) [If upon] SUBJECT TO § 8–407 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF ON
hearing the parties, or [in case] IF the tenant or person in possession [shall neglect to]
DOES NOT appear after the summons and continuance, the court [shall find] FINDS that
the landlord had been in possession of the leased property, that the [said] tenancy is fully
ended and expired, that due notice to [quit as aforesaid had been] VACATE THE PROPERTY
WAS given to the tenant or person in possession and that the tenant or person in possession
[had] refused so to do, the court shall [thereupon] give judgment for the restitution of the
possession of [said] THE premises and shall [forthwith] IMMEDIATELY issue [its] A
warrant OF RESTITUTION to the sheriff or a constable in the respective counties
commanding the tenant or person in possession [forthwith] to deliver FULL POSSESSION
OF THE PROPERTY IMMEDIATELY to the landlord [possession thereof in as full and ample
manner as the landlord was possessed of the same at the time when the tenancy was made],
and [shall give] ENTER judgment for costs against the tenant or person in possession [so]
holding over.
8–402.1.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to § 8–406 of this subtitle and where an unexpired lease
for a stated term provides that the landlord may repossess the premises prior to the

HOUSE BILL 1093 3
expiration of the stated term if the tenant breaches the lease, the landlord may make
complaint in writing to the District Court of the county where the premises is located if:
1. The tenant breaches the lease;
2. A. The landlord has given the tenant 30 days’ written
notice that the tenant is in violation of the lease and the landlord desires to repossess the
leased premises; or
B. The breach of the lease involves behavior by a tenant or a
person who is on the property with the tenant’s consent, which demonstrates a clear and
imminent danger of the tenant or person doing serious harm to themselves, other tenants,
the landlord, the landlord’s property or representatives, or any other person on the property
and the landlord has given the tenant or person in possession 14 days’ written notice that
the tenant or person in possession is in violation of the lease and the landlord desires to
repossess the leased premises; and
3. The tenant or person in actual possession of the premises
refuses to comply.
(ii) The court shall summons immediately the tenant or person in
possession to appear before the court on a day stated in the summons to show cause, if any,
why restitution of the possession of the leased premises should not be made to the landlord.
(b) (1) [If] SUBJECT TO § 8–407 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF the court determines
that the tenant breached the terms of the lease and that the breach was substantial and
warrants an eviction, the court shall give judgment for the restitution of the possession of
the premises and issue its warrant OF RESTITUTION to the sheriff or a constable
commanding the tenant to deliver possession to the landlord in as full and ample manner
as the landlord was possessed of the same at the time when the lease was entered into. The
court shall give judgment for costs against the tenant or person in possession.
8–407.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DWELLING UNIT” MEANS THAT PORTION OF A BUILDING THAT IS
DESIGNATED, INTENDED, OR ARRANGED FOR USE OR OCCUPANCY AS A RESIDENCE
BY ONE OR MORE PERSONS, INCLUDING A RENTED ROOM IN A SINGLE–FAMILY
HOUSE.
(3) “MOVING EXPENSES” MEANS COSTS INCURRED TO:
(I) PACK, UNPACK, STORE, OR TRANSPORT PERSONAL
PROPERTY;

HOUSE BILL 1093
(II) DISCONNECT AND INSTALL PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(III) INSURE PERSONAL PROPERTY TO BE MOVED; OR
(IV) DISCONNECT OR RECONNECT UTILITIES, INCLUDING
TELEPHONE SERVICE, GAS, WATER, AND ELECTRICITY.
(4) “MOVING SERVICES” MEANS SERVICES FOR THE LOADING,
PACKING, TRANSPORTING, UNLOADING, OR OTHERWISE TAKING POSSESSION OR
CONTROL OF PERSONAL PROPERTY FOR THE PURPOSE OF MOVING THE PROPERTY
TO ANOTHER LOCATION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LANDLORD WHO OFFERS NINE OR
FEWER DWELLING UNITS.
(C) IF A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION IS EXECUTED TO PUT A LANDLORD IN
POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY UNDER § 8–401, § 8–402, OR § 8–402.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE OR AN EQUIVALENT PROVISION OF LOCAL LAW, THE PERSONAL
PROPERTY OF THE TENANT SHALL BE DEEMED ABANDONED AND MAY BE PLACED IN
A PUBLIC RIGHT–OF–WAY ABUTTING THE PROPERTY.
(D) A COUNTY OR A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ENACT OR ENFORCE A LOCAL
LAW OR ORDINANCE REQUIRING A LANDLORD TO COMPENSATE A TENANT FOR
MOVING EXPENSES OR PROVIDE MOVING SERVICES OR SUPPLIES TO A TENANT IN
CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION FOR POSSESSION UNDER § 8–401, § 8–402, OR §
8–402.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR UNDER AN EQUIVALENT PROVISION OF LOCAL LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any cause of action for repossession for failure to pay rent, breach of lease, or
tenant holdovers before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.